Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.520

Statewide off-campus telecommunications system—Authorized—Purpose, education in high-technology fields—Availability of facilities.

The board of regents of Washington State University is hereby authorized to establish a statewide off-campus telecommunications system to provide for graduate and continuing education in high-technology fields to citizens of the state of Washington. The statewide telecommunications system shall be administered by Washington State University with the advice of the high-technology coordinating board. Washington State University shall make the facilities of the statewide telecommunications system available to other institutions of higher education when specific program needs so require.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 14.]